Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF93.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1622YH (5) 91 ll/ns H.F. 93 Section 1. Section 123.43, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 5. For purposes of this section, 3 âpremisesâ , in addition to premises as defined in section 123.3, 4 may include any of the following noncontiguous locations, 5 provided that such noncontiguous locations are approved by the 6 alcohol and tobacco tax and trade bureau of the United States 7 department of the treasury: 8 a. Any number of locations which are only separated from 9 the premises as defined in section 123.3 by public waterways, 10 roads, or carrier rights-of-way. 11 b. Any number of locations in the same general location as 12 the premises as defined in section 123.3. 13 c. An additional warehouse or warehouses, located somewhere 14 other than on the premises as defined in section 123.3 or a 15 location described in paragraph âaâ or âbâ . 16